Utah statutes.
59-5-115.   Disposition of taxes collected -- Credit to General Fund.

All taxes imposed and collected under Section 59-5-102 shall be paid to the commission, promptly remitted to the state treasurer, and except those taxes otherwise allocated under Section 51-9-305, 59-5-116, or 59-5-119, credited to the General Fund.

